Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 23. Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act.
§ 56-585.1:10.
(Expires December 31, 2023) Pilot program for transmission facilities serving business parks.

The Virginia Economic Development Partnership shall conduct a pilot program within the certificated service territory of each investor-owned electric utility, other than a utility described in subsection G of § 56-580 (Pilot Utility), or within a business
park located in Planning District 19 for the purpose of promoting economic development in areas of the Commonwealth. The pilot program shall allow any Pilot Utility to complete the construction phase of a transmission line and associated
substation to provide the electric infrastructure to a business park, as defined in § 56-576, located within the Pilot Utility’s certificated service territory or within Planning District 19 where investments by a locality or an industrial
development authority or a similar political subdivision of the Commonwealth created pursuant to §

15.2-4903

or other act of the General Assembly in the siting, environmental review, pre-engineering design, and transmission right-of-way acquisition have been made prior to the public announcement of a prospective occupant of
the business park. Each pilot program shall be subject to the following terms, conditions, and restrictions:

The costs incurred by the Pilot Utility after January 1, 2019, to construct, operate, and maintain transmission lines and associated substations installed in order to provide service to a business park participating in the pilot program shall be recovered
by the Pilot Utility pursuant to a rate adjustment clause approved by the Commission in subdivision A 4 of § 56-585.1.

Qualifying projects shall have revenue sharing agreements between two or more localities.

Each individual qualifying project shall be less than seven miles in length.

The role of the Virginia Economic Development Partnership in conducting the pilot program is to certify that up to three petitions for each Pilot Utility address the eligibility criteria for participation in the pilot program set forth in § 56-576 and
in this section.

History.
2019, c. 535; 2022, c. 216.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 535, cl. 2 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2019, c. 535, cl. 3 provides: “That a utility consumer services cooperative organized pursuant to Chapter 9.1 (§ 56-231.15 et seq.) of Title 56 of the Code of Virginia may, but shall not be required to, conduct a pilot program on the same basis as
an investor-owned utility that is a Pilot Utility pursuant to the second enactment of this act by filing an appropriate application or petition before the Commission. Should such a petition or application be filed by a cooperative,
the cooperative may recover its costs pursuant to a rate adjustment clause approved by the Commission in subdivision A 4 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act. For purposes of this act only, a cooperative shall
be subject to the provisions of subdivision A 4 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, insofar as they relate to infrastructure for business parks.”

Acts 2019, c. 535, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on December 31, 2023. The expiration of this act shall not affect the cost recovery of constructing a transmission facility that is commenced prior to such date as part of
a pilot program conducted pursuant to the second or third enactment of this act.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 216 in the introductory paragraph, in the first sentence, inserted “or within a business park located in Planning District 19” and deleted “designated as an opportunity zone listed by the U.S. Secretary of the Treasury via his
delegation of authority to the Internal Revenue Service” at the end and in the second sentence, deleted “in an opportunity zone” and substituted “within the Pilot Utility's certificated service territory or within Planning District
19 where investments by a locality or” for “in an opportunity zone within the Pilot Utility's certificated service territory where investments by”; deleted subdivision 1, which read: “As used in this section, ‘opportunity zone’ means
areas of the Commonwealth designated as a qualified opportunity zone by the U.S. Secretary of the Treasury via his delegation of authority to the Internal Revenue Service”; and in subdivision 4, substituted the first instance of “for”
for “within the certificated service territory of” and “address” for “addresses”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 56-585.1:11.
Development of offshore wind capacity.

As used in this section:“Advanced clean energy buyer” means a commercial or industrial customer of a Phase II Utility, irrespective of generation supplier, (i) with an aggregate load over 100 megawatts; (ii) with an aggregate amount of at least 200 megawatts
of solar or wind energy supply under contract with a term of 10 years or more from facilities located within the Commonwealth by January 1, 2024; and (iii) that directly procures from the utility the electric supply and environmental
attributes of the offshore wind facility associated with the lesser of 50 megawatts of nameplate capacity or 15 percent of the commercial or industrial customer’s annual peak demand for a contract period of 15 years.“Aggregate
load” means the combined electrical load associated with selected accounts of an advanced clean energy buyer with the same legal entity name as, or in the names of affiliated entities that control, are controlled by, or are under
common control of, such legal entity or are the names of affiliated entities under a common parent.“Control” means the legal right, directly or indirectly, to direct or cause the direction of the management, actions, or policies
of an affiliated entity, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract, or otherwise. “Control” does not include control of an entity through a franchise or similar contractual agreement.“Qualifying large general
service customer” means a customer of a Phase II Utility, irrespective of general supplier, (i) whose peak demand during the most recent calendar year exceeded five megawatts and (ii) that contracts with the utility to directly
procure electric supply and environmental attributes associated with the offshore wind facility in amounts commensurate with the customer’s electric usage for a contract period of 15 years or more.

In order to meet the Commonwealth’s clean energy goals, prior to December 31, 2034, the construction or purchase by a public utility of one or more offshore wind generation facilities located off the Commonwealth’s Atlantic shoreline or in federal waters
and interconnected directly into the Commonwealth, with an aggregate capacity of up to 5,200 megawatts, is in the public interest and the Commission shall so find, provided that no customers of the utility shall be responsible
for costs of any such facility in a proportion greater than the utility’s share of the facility.

Pursuant to subsection B, construction by a Phase II Utility of one or more new utility-owned and utility-operated generating facilities utilizing energy derived from offshore wind and located off the Commonwealth’s Atlantic shoreline, with an aggregate
rated capacity of not less than 2,500 megawatts and not more than 3,000 megawatts, along with electrical transmission or distribution facilities associated therewith for interconnection is in the public interest. In acting
upon any request for cost recovery by a Phase II Utility for costs associated with such a facility, the Commission shall determine the reasonableness and prudence of any such costs, provided that such costs shall be presumed
to be reasonably and prudently incurred if the Commission determines that (i) the utility has complied with the competitive solicitation and procurement requirements pursuant to subsection E; (ii) the project’s projected
total levelized cost of energy, including any tax credit, on a cost per megawatt hour basis, inclusive of the costs of transmission and distribution facilities associated with the facility’s interconnection, does not exceed
1.4 times the comparable cost, on an unweighted average basis, of a conventional simple cycle combustion turbine generating facility as estimated by the U.S. Energy Information Administration in its Annual Energy Outlook
2019; and (iii) the utility has commenced construction of such facilities for U.S. income taxation purposes prior to January 1, 2024, or has a plan for such facility or facilities to be in service prior to January 1, 2028.
The Commission shall disallow costs, or any portion thereof, only if they are otherwise unreasonably and imprudently incurred. In its review, the Commission shall give due consideration to (a) the Commonwealth’s renewable
portfolio standards and carbon reduction requirements, (b) the promotion of new renewable generation resources, and (c) the economic development benefits of the project for the Commonwealth, including capital investments
and job creation. C. 1. Pursuant to subsection B, construction by a Phase II Utility of one or more new utility-owned and utility-operated generating facilities utilizing energy derived from offshore wind and located off
the Commonwealth’s Atlantic shoreline, with an aggregate rated capacity of not less than 2,500 megawatts and not more than 3,000 megawatts, along with electrical transmission or distribution facilities associated therewith
for interconnection is in the public interest. In acting upon any request for cost recovery by a Phase II Utility for costs associated with such a facility, the Commission shall determine the reasonableness and prudence
of any such costs, provided that such costs shall be presumed to be reasonably and prudently incurred if the Commission determines that (i) the utility has complied with the competitive solicitation and procurement requirements
pursuant to subsection E; (ii) the project’s projected total levelized cost of energy, including any tax credit, on a cost per megawatt hour basis, inclusive of the costs of transmission and distribution facilities associated
with the facility’s interconnection, does not exceed 1.4 times the comparable cost, on an unweighted average basis, of a conventional simple cycle combustion turbine generating facility as estimated by the U.S. Energy Information
Administration in its Annual Energy Outlook 2019; and (iii) the utility has commenced construction of such facilities for U.S. income taxation purposes prior to January 1, 2024, or has a plan for such facility or facilities
to be in service prior to January 1, 2028. The Commission shall disallow costs, or any portion thereof, only if they are otherwise unreasonably and imprudently incurred. In its review, the Commission shall give due consideration
to (a) the Commonwealth’s renewable portfolio standards and carbon reduction requirements, (b) the promotion of new renewable generation resources, and (c) the economic development benefits of the project for the Commonwealth,
including capital investments and job creation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 56-585.1, the Commission shall not grant an enhanced rate of return to a Phase II Utility for the construction of one or more new utility-owned and utility-operated generating facilities utilizing energy derived from
offshore wind and located off the Commonwealth’s Atlantic shoreline pursuant to this section.

Any such costs proposed for recovery through a rate adjustment clause pursuant to subdivision A 6 of § 56-585.1 shall be allocated to all customers of the utility in the Commonwealth as a non-bypassable charge, regardless of the generation supplier of
any such customer, other than (i) PIPP eligible utility customers, (ii) advanced clean energy buyers, and (iii) qualifying large general service customers. No electric cooperative customer of the utility shall be assigned,
nor shall the utility collect from any such cooperative, any of the costs of such facilities, including electrical transmission or distribution facilities associated therewith for interconnection. The Commission may promulgate
such rules, regulations, or other directives necessary to administer the eligibility for these exemptions.

The Commission shall permit a portion of the nameplate capacity of any such facility, in the aggregate, to be allocated to (i) advanced clean energy buyers or (ii) qualifying large general service customers, provided that no more than 10 percent of the
offshore wind facility’s capacity is allocated to qualifying large general service customers. A Phase II Utility shall petition the Commission for approval of a special contract with any advanced clean energy buyer, or
any special rate applicable to qualifying large general service customers, pursuant to § 56-235.2, no later than 15 months prior to the projected commercial operation date of the facility, and all customer enrollments associated
with such special contracts or rates shall be completed prior to commercial operation of the facility. Any such special contract or rate may include provisions for levelized rates of service over the duration of the customer’s
contracted agreement with the utility, and the Commission shall determine that such special contract or rate is designed to hold nonparticipating customers harmless over its term in connection with any petition for approval
by the utility. The utility may petition for approval of such special contracts or rates in connection with any petition for approval of a rate adjustment clause pursuant to subdivision A 6 of § 56-585.1 to recover the
costs of the facility, and the Commission shall rule upon any such petitions in its final order in such proceeding within nine months from the date of filing.

In constructing any such facility contemplated in subsection B, the utility shall develop and submit a plan to the Commission for review that includes the following considerations: (i) options for utilizing local workers; (ii) the economic development
benefits of the project for the Commonwealth, including capital investments and job creation; (iii) consultation with the Commonwealth’s Chief Workforce Development Officer, the Chief Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion Officer, and
the Virginia Economic Development Partnership on opportunities to advance the Commonwealth’s workforce and economic development goals, including furtherance of apprenticeship and other workforce training programs; (iv) giving priority
to the hiring, apprenticeship, and training of veterans, as that term is defined in §

2.2-2000.1

, local workers, and workers from historically economically disadvantaged communities; and (v) procurement of equipment from Virginia-based or United States-based manufacturers using materials or product components
made in Virginia or the United States, if reasonably available and competitively priced.

Any project constructed or purchased pursuant to subsection B shall (i) be subject to competitive procurement or solicitation for a substantial majority of the services and equipment, exclusive of interconnection costs, associated with the facility’s
construction; (ii) involve at least one experienced developer; and (iii) demonstrate the economic development benefits within the Commonwealth, including capital investments and job creation. A utility may give appropriate consideration
to suppliers and developers that have demonstrated successful experience in offshore wind.

Any project shall include an environmental and fisheries mitigation plan submitted to the Commission for the construction and operation of such offshore wind facilities, provided that such plan includes an explicit description of the best management practices
the bidder will employ that considers the latest science at the time the proposal is made to mitigate adverse impacts to wildlife, natural resources, ecosystems, and traditional or existing water-dependent uses. The plan shall
include a summary of pre-construction assessment activities, consistent with federal requirements, to determine the spatial and temporal presence and abundance of marine mammals, sea turtles, birds, and bats in the offshore wind
lease area.

History.
2020, cc. 1193, 1194, 1240, 1273, 1279; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 328.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1194, cl. 10 provides: “That the investor-owned utility constructing a facility pursuant to § 56-585.1:11 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall provide the State Corporation Commission with reports on the facility’s
construction progress, including performance to construction timeline and budget, on no less than a quarterly basis throughout the construction period. The State Corporation Commission shall retain ongoing authority to review the reasonableness
and prudence of any increases in the total projected cost of the RPS Program and the offshore wind facility during its construction period.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1194, cl. 13 provides: “That this bill shall be referred to as the Virginia Clean Economy Act.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1240, 1273 and 1279, cl. 2 provides: “That the utility constructing a facility pursuant to § 56-585.1:11 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall provide the State Corporation Commission (the Commission) with reports on the
facility’s construction progress, including performance to construction timeline and budget, on no less than a quarterly basis throughout the construction period. The Commission shall retain ongoing authority to review the reasonableness
and prudence of any increases in the total projected cost of the facility during its construction period.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 328, effective July 1, 2021, added clause (v) in subsection D, and made related changes.

§ 56-585.1:12.
Multi-family shared solar program.

As used in this section:“Applicable bill credit rate” means the dollar-per-kilowatt-hour rate as defined in subsection D used to calculate a subscriber’s bill credit. The applicable bill credit rate shall be set such that the shared solar program results
in robust project development and shared solar program access for all customer classes.“Bill credit” means the monetary value of the electricity, in kilowatt-hours, generated by the shared solar facility allocated to a subscriber
to offset that subscriber’s electricity bill.“Investor-owned utility” means each investor-owned utility in the Commonwealth including, notwithstanding subsection G of § 56-580, any investor-owned utility whose service territory
assigned to it by the Commission is located entirely within the Counties of Dickenson, Lee, Russell, Scott and Wise. “Investor-owned utility” does not include a Phase I Utility, as that term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1.“Multi-family
shared solar program” or program” means the program created through the adoption of rules to allow for the development of shared solar facilities described in subsection C.“Shared solar facility” means a facility that:

Generates electricity by means of a solar photovoltaic device with a nameplate capacity rating that does not exceed 3,000 kW alternating current at any single location or that does not exceed 5,000 kW alternating current at contiguous locations owned
by the same entity or affiliated entities;

Is operated pursuant to a program whereby at least three subscribers receive a bill credit for the electricity generated from the facility in proportion to the size of their subscription;

Is located in the service territory of an investor-owned utility;

Is connected to the electric distribution grid serving the Commonwealth; and

Is located on a parcel of land on the premises of the multi-family utility customer or adjacent thereto.“Subscriber” means a multi-family customer of an investor-owned electric utility that owns one or more subscriptions of a shared solar facility that
is interconnected with the utility.“Subscriber organization” means any for-profit or nonprofit entity that owns or operates one or more shared solar facilities. A “subscriber organization” shall not be considered a utility
solely as a result of its ownership or operation of a shared solar facility.“Subscription” means a contract or other agreement between a subscriber and the owner of a shared solar facility. A subscription shall be sized
such that the estimated bill credits do not exceed the subscriber’s average annual bill for the customer account to which the subscription is attributed.

The Commission shall establish by regulation a program that affords eligible multi-family customers of investor-owned utilities the opportunity to participate in shared solar projects. The regulations shall be adopted by the Commission by January 1, 2021.

An investor-owned utility shall provide a bill credit to a subscriber’s subsequent monthly electric bill for the proportional output of a shared solar facility attributable to that subscriber. The shared solar program shall be administered as follows:

The value of the bill credit for the subscriber shall be calculated by multiplying the subscriber’s portion of the kilowatt-hour electricity production from the shared solar facility by the applicable bill credit rate for the subscriber. Any amount of
the bill credit that exceeds the subscriber’s monthly bill shall be carried over and applied to the next month’s bill in perpetuity;

The utility shall provide bill credits to a shared solar facility’s subscribers for not less than 25 years from the date the shared solar facility becomes commercially operational;

The subscriber organization shall, on a monthly basis and in a standardized electronic format, provide to the investor-owned utility a subscriber list indicating the kilowatt-hours of generation attributable to each of the retail customers participating
in a shared solar facility in accordance with the subscriber’s portion of the output of the shared solar facility;

Lists may be updated monthly to reflect canceling subscribers and to add new subscribers. The investor-owned utility shall apply bill credits to subscriber bills within one billing cycle following the cycle during which the energy was generated by the
shared solar facility;

The investor-owned utility shall, on a monthly basis and in a standardized electronic format, provide to the subscriber organization a report indicating the total value of bill credits generated by the shared solar facility in the prior month as well
as the amount of the bill credit applied to each subscriber;

A subscriber organization may accumulate bill credits in the event that all of the electricity generated by a shared solar facility is not allocated to subscribers in a given month. On an annual basis, the subscriber organization shall furnish to the
utility allocation instructions for distributing excess bill credits to subscribers; and

All environmental attributes associated with a shared solar facility, including renewable energy certificates, shall be considered property of the subscriber organization. At the subscriber organization’s discretion, those attributes may be distributed
to subscribers, sold to investor-owned utilities or other buyers, accumulated, or retired.

The Commission shall annually calculate the applicable bill credit rate as the effective retail rate of the customer’s rate class, which shall be inclusive of all supply charges, delivery charges, demand charges, fixed charges, and any applicable riders
or other charges to the customer. This rate shall be expressed in dollars or cents per kilowatt-hour.

The Commission shall establish by regulation a multi-family shared solar program by January 1, 2021, and shall require each investor-owned utility to file any tariffs, agreements, or forms necessary for implementation of the program. Any rule or utility
implementation filings approved by the Commission shall:

Reasonably allow for the creation and financing of shared solar facilities;

Allow all customer classes to participate in the program, and ensure participation opportunities for all customer classes;

Not remove a customer from its otherwise applicable customer class in order to participate in a shared solar facility;

Reasonably allow for the transferability and portability of subscriptions, including allowing a subscriber to retain a subscription in a shared solar facility if the subscriber moves within the same utility territory;

Establish uniform standards, fees, and processes for the interconnection of shared solar facilities that allow the utility to recover reasonable interconnection costs for each shared solar facility;

Adopt standardized consumer disclosure forms;

Allow the investor-owned utilities to recover reasonable costs of administering the program;

Ensure nondiscriminatory and efficient requirements and utility procedures for interconnecting projects;

Address the colocation of two or more shared solar facilities on a single parcel of land, and provide guidelines for determining when two or more facilities are colocated; and

Include a program implementation schedule.

Within 180 days of finalization of the Commission’s adoption of regulations for the shared solar program, utilities shall begin crediting subscriber accounts of each shared solar facility interconnected in its service territory.

History.
2020, cc. 1187, 1188, 1189, 1239, § 56-585.1:11.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 2020 act having been § 56-585.1:11.

§ 56-585.1:13.
Recovery of costs associated with investment in transportation electification.

Beginning July 1, 2021, any approved costs of any investor-owned electric utility associated with investment in transportation electrification, other than those costs approved prior to July 1, 2021, shall be recovered only through the utility’s rates
for generation and distribution, shall not be recovered through a rate adjustment clause pursuant to subdivision A 6 of § 56-585.1, and shall not be eligible for a customer credit reinvestment offset pursuant to subdivision A 8 d of
§ 56-585.1. To the extent that the provisions of this section are inconsistent with the provisions of § 56-585.1, the provisions of this section shall control.

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 268.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 268, cl. 1, § 2 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 268, cl. 1, § 1 provides:

“§ 1. It is the policy of the Commonwealth that transportation electrification will reduce dependence on petroleum, improve air quality and public health, reduce vehicle fueling costs, and reduce emissions of greenhouse gases from the transportation sector.
To achieve these goals, among other steps, it is necessary to ensure there is adequate electric vehicle charging infrastructure deployed throughout the Commonwealth. It is further the policy of the Commonwealth to promote, to the greatest
extent possible, private competition and investment in transportation electrification and to enable public utilities and the public sector to complement such private investment where most effective.

“Therefore, the State Corporation Commission (Commission) shall submit a report to the General Assembly, no later than May 1, 2022, recommending policy proposals that could govern public electric utility programs to accelerate widespread transportation
electrification in the Commonwealth. To guide policy proposal development, the Commission shall utilize a public process, in which the Commission, the Department of Environmental Quality, the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy,
the Department of Transportation, and appropriate stakeholders shall participate. The Commission shall identify and retain a third-party facilitator with expertise in transportation electrification to facilitate such public process.

“In developing its policy recommendations, the Commission shall evaluate, among other things:

“1. Areas where utility or other public investment may best complement private efforts to effectively deploy charging infrastructure, with particular focus on low-income, minority, and rural communities;

“2. How smart growth policies can complement and enhance the Commonwealth’s transportation electrification goals; and

“3. How utility programs, investments, or incentives to customers or third parties to facilitate the deployment of charging infrastructure and related upgrades can support or enhance (i) statewide transportation electrification, including electrification
of public transit; (ii) the electrification of medium-duty and heavy-duty vehicles, school buses, vehicles at ports and airports, personal vehicles, and vehicle fleets; (iii) increased access to electric transportation and improved
air quality in low-income and medium-income communities; (iv) achievement of the energy storage targets established in subsection E of § 56-585.5 of the Code of Virginia; (v) improvements to the distribution grid or to specific sites
necessary to accommodate charging infrastructure; and (vi) customer education and outreach programs that increase awareness of such programs and the benefits of transportation electrification.

“The report shall also address whether and how transportation electrification can, under current law:

“a. Reduce total ratepayer rates and costs;

“b. Assist in grid management and more efficient use of the grid, in a manner that does not increase peak demand, through time-of-use rates, managed charging programs, vehicle-to-grid programs, or other alternative rate designs;

“c. Utilize increased generation from renewable energy resources; and

“d. Reduce fueling costs for vehicles.

“To the extent that the Commission and stakeholders conclude that transportation electrification cannot currently deliver these benefits, then the report shall include recommendations on how public policy can change in order to do so.”

§ 56-585.2.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1194, cl. 3.

Editor’s note.

Former § 56-585.2, pertaining to sale of electricity from renewable sources through a renewable energy portfolio standard program, derived from 2007, cc. 888, 933; 2008, c. 651; 2009, c. 744; 2010, c. 850; 2012, cc. 46, 67, 200, 274, 348, 717; 2013, cc.
2, 308, 403; 2014, cc. 420, 465; 2016, cc. 300, 661.